Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2633
Grant; repayment.

(1)(a) If the department determines that a grant recipient used the grant other than as provided in section 43-2631, the department may request the grant recipient to repay such grant and any remaining portion of the grant in the possession of the grant recipient to the department.

(b) If the department determines that a grant recipient falsified any information provided in the application process, the department may request the grant recipient to repay any or all of the grant disbursed to the grant recipient.

(2) A grant recipient that receives a request to repay a grant pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may appeal the decision, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(3) Any money received under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Cash Fund.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 37.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.